Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4862
Act, how cited.

Sections
44-4801 to 44-4862 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Insurers
Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 85;

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 17;

Laws 2011, LB72, § 8.